District of Columbia statutes.
7-2035

Licenses issued pursuant to prior law.

Except as otherwise provided by this subchapter, any child development facility licensed pursuant to the Child Development Facilities Regulation, enacted December 14, 1974 (Reg. 74-34; 29 DCMR § 300 et seq.) (“Child Development Facilities Regulation”), as amended, shall be considered licensed pursuant to this subchapter and shall be subject to renewal requirements established pursuant to this subchapter.

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-215, § 6, 46 DCR 274
1981 Ed., § 6-3625.
See notes to § 7-2031.
For temporary addition of subchapter, see notes to § 7-2031.